src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
nuori:nuore a_12 ;
pieni:piene a_12 ;
uusi:uute a_12_si ; !!= * @CODE@
täysi:täyte a_12_si ;
tyven:tyven a_22 ; !!= * @CODE@
tinatyven:tina#tyven a_22 ;
vasen:vase a_22_ma ; !!= * @CODE@
veres:vere a_22_excns ; !!= * @CODE@
kauhhee:kauhe a_31_ee ;
makkee:makke a_31_ee ; ! TODO TODO TODO check these, valkkee etc. confusion
auttii:autt2ii a_31_ii ; !!= * @CODE@
tyyris:tyyr a_32_is ; ! a_32_is
voimakas:voimakk a_32_as ; ! a_32_as
tuoret:tuor a_32_et ; ! vanha_a_33t -> a_32_et
tervet:terv a_32_et ; ! vanha_a_33t -> a_32_et
vaipunu:vaipun a_32_u ; ! vanha_33-> a_32_u
väsyny:väsyn a_32_väsynyt ;
kärys:kär a_32_kärys ;
irtain:irt2ai vanha_a_32m ;
ilakka a_21_oi;
käsipuoli:käsi#puole a_12 ;
silmäpuoli:silmä#puole a_12 ;
liehmuu a_31_uu  ;
puoli:puole a_12 ;
suuri:suure a_12 ;
veres:vere a_22_excns ;
latuskainen:latuskai a_22_inen ;
pitukainen:pitukai a_22_inen ;
tuiskalainen:tuiskalai a_22_inen ;
suomalainen:suomalai a_22_inen ;
saamilainen:saamilai a_22_inen ;
pienenlainen:pienenlai a_22_inen ;
isonlainen:isonlai a_22_inen ;
jonkulainen:jonkulai a_22_inen ;
aukinainen:aukinai a_22_inen ;
histoorialinen:histooriali a_22_inen ;
tavalinen:tavali a_22_inen ;
murheelinen:murheeli a_22_inen ;
äänelinen:ääneli a_22_inen ;
arkiivifaakilinen:arkiivifaakili a_22_inen ;
uskolinen:uskoli a_22_inen ;
kiitolinen:kiitoli a_22_inen ;
ruuđulinen:ruuđuli a_22_inen ;
aurinkoinen:aurinkoi a_22_inen ;
sympaattinen:sympaatti a_22_inen ;
omituinen:omitui a_22_inen ;
pitkyläinen:pitkyläi a_22_inen ;
ylimäinen:ylimäi a_22_inen ;
ymmyräinen:ymmyräi a_22_inen ;
javolinen:javoli a_22_inen ;
myötäinen:myötäi a_22_inen ;
tihhee:tihhe a_31_ee ;
laakkee:laakke a_31_ee ;
sakkee:sakke a_31_ee ;
oikkee:oikke a_31_ee ;
valkkee:valkke a_31_ee ;
ilmivalkkee:ilmi#valkke a_31_ee ;
sokkee:sokke a_31_ee ;
korkkee:korkke a_31_ee ;
aukkee:aukke a_31_ee ;
ruskee:ruske a_31_ee ;
notkee:notke a_31_ee ;
vaalee:vaale a_31_ee ;
sillee:sille a_31_ee ;
himmee:himme a_31_ee ;
pilkkapimmee:pilkkapimme a_31_ee ;
syyspimmee:syys#pimme a_31_ee ;
kirmee:kirme a_31_ee ;
rappee:rappe a_31_ee ;
lieppee:lieppe a_31_ee ;
merikippee:merikippe a_31_ee ;
noppee:noppe a_31_ee ;
korree:korre a_31_ee ;
pyöree:pyöre a_31_ee ;
ussee:us a_31_ussee ;
kostee:koste a_31_ee ;
kevvee:kevve a_31_ee ;
hapan:happa a_22_ma ;
vasen:vase a_22_ma ;
parhain:parhai a_22_ma ;
lämmin:lämpi a_22_ma ;
korkea a_31_ea;
ruskea a_31_ea ;
sakea a_31_ea ;
nykyaikhanen:nykyaikha a_22_inen_odd ;
pitkäjalkanen:pitkäjalka a_22_inen_odd ;
aniliinipunanen:aniliinipuna a_22_inen_odd ;
vihainen:vihai a_22_inen_odd ;
eriskumhainen:eriskumhai a_22_inen_odd ;
vastahankainen:vastahankai a_22_inen_odd ;
maalainen:maalai a_22_inen_odd ;
höperänlainen:höperänlai a_22_inen_odd ;
punainen:punai a_22_inen_odd ;
ristiraitainen:ristiraitai a_22_inen_odd ;
yhđenkertainen:yhđenkertai a_22_inen_odd ;
ylheinen:ylhei a_22_inen_odd ;
pahanilkinen:pahanilki a_22_inen_odd ;
suomenkielinen:suomenkieli a_22_inen_odd ;
ystävällinen:ystävälli a_22_inen_odd ;
pahanjuoninen:pahanjuoni a_22_inen_odd ;
suloinen:suloi a_22_inen_odd ;
pahankurinen:pahankuri a_22_inen_odd ;
entinen:enti a_22_inen_odd ;
kahđeksenkanttinen:kahđeksenkantti a_22_inen_odd ;
nekatiivinen:nekatiivi a_22_inen_odd ;
äkäinen:äkäi a_22_inen_odd ;
vapaaehtonen:vapaaehto a_22_inen_odd ;
näkönen:näkö a_22_inen_odd ;
ylinen:yli a_22_inen_odd ;
tosi:tote a_12_si ;
pahas:pah a_32_as ;
puhelias:puheli a_32_as ;
laupias:laupi a_32_as ;
kaikkivaltias:kaikkivalti a_32_as ;
paljas:palj a_32_as ;
onnekas:onnekk a_32_as ;
vitamiinikas:vitamiinikk a_32_as ;
lajirikas:laji#rikk a_32_as ;
tietorikas:tieto#rikk a_32_as ;
lapsikas:lapsikk a_32_as ;
vilkas:vilkk a_32_as ;
arvokas:arvokk a_32_as ;
autuas:autu a_32_as ;
raskas:rask a_32_as ; !sk ei vaihtelussa!
vanhurskas:vanhursk a_32_as ;
armas:arm a_32_as ;
opas:opp a_32_as ;
ventovieras:ventovier a_32_as ;
viisas:viis a_32_as ;
runsas:runs a_32_as ;
ahđas:aht a_32_as ;
hiđas:hit a_32_as ;
laatas:laatt a_32_as ;
raavas:raav a_32_as ;
sinnikäs:sinnikk vanha_a_33aes ;
kallis:kall a_32_is ;
valmis:valm a_32_is ;
kaunis:kaun a_32_is ;
raitis:raitt a_32_is ;
tivis:tiv a_32_is ;
ahnet:ahn a_32_et ;
tiinet:tiin a_32_et ;
kuolu:kuol a_32_u ;
kokenu:koken a_32_u ;
nainu:nain a_32_u ;
oppinu:oppin a_32_u ;
ravistunnu:ravistunn a_32_u ;
hermostunnu:hermostunn a_32_u ;
suuttunu:suuttun a_32_u ;
färirikas:färi#rikk a_32_as ;
hengestynny:hengestynn a_32_nny ; ! vanha_a_33u ei toimi y-päätteisillä
hengistynny:hengistynn  a_32_nny ; ! vanha_a_33u ei toimi y-päätteisillä
